District of Columbia statutes.
29-802.03

Signing of records to be delivered for filing to Mayor.

(a)

A record delivered to the Mayor for filing pursuant to this chapter must be signed as follows:

(1)

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) and (3) of this subsection, a record signed on behalf of a limited liability company shall be signed by a person authorized by the company.

(2)

A limited liability company’s initial certificate of organization shall be signed by at least one person acting as an organizer.

(3)

A record filed on behalf of a dissolved limited liability company that has no members shall be signed by the person winding up the company’s activities and affairs under § 29-807.02(c) or a person appointed under § 29-807.02(d) to wind up those activities and affairs.

(4)

A statement of denial by a person under § 29-803.03 shall be signed by that person.

(5)

Any other record delivered to the Mayor for filing on behalf of a person shall be signed by that person.

(b)

A person that signs a record as an agent or legal representative thereby affirms that the person is authorized to sign the record.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(3)(C), 59 DCR 13171

History

This section is referenced in § 29-809.04.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 203 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes